Rhode Island, session 2025, SB959.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 28 of the General Laws entitled "LABOR AND LABOR RELATIONS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 61
WORKPLACE PSYCHOLOGICAL SAFETY ACT
28-61-1. Purpose.
It is the purpose of this chapter to ensure the psychological safety of employees and/or the
work environment without regard to protected class status by holding employers accountable for
bullying conduct.
28-61-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following
meanings:
(1) “Employee” means any person who renders services to an employer, contractor, or any
other entity and receives compensation for those services, including full- and part-time paid
employees, temporary employees, contracted employees, and independent contractors.
(2) “Employer” means a person or entity of any size who obtains services from a full- or
part-time paid employee, temporary employee, contracted employee, or independent contractor and
hires at least one employee for any compensation. This chapter applies to employers with a
minimum of fifteen (15) employees only.

(3) “Representative employee” means an employee in a leadership, management, or legal
position whose responsibility is to advise on, oversee, and/or enforce organizational policies.
28-61-3. Workplace Bullying Regulation.
(a) Workplace bullying shall be unlawful. Workplace bullying is unwelcome, degrading,
and dehumanizing conduct, that is severe or pervasive enough to create a work environment that a
reasonable person would consider threatening, hostile, or abusive and that unreasonably interferes
with the target’s ability to perform job duties. Conduct may include false accusations, sabotage of
work performance, consistent ignoring or ostracism, removal of major responsibilities, consistent
unreasonable workloads, excessive monitoring, consistent micromanagement, persistent
hypercriticism, impossible deadlines, pressure to engage in unethical behavior or give up rights or
benefits, retaliation for speaking up, or repeated verbal abuse. Isolated, minor incidents, expressions
of disagreement, and constructive feedback are not bullying unless they meet the severe or
pervasive standard. Workplace bullying may be perpetrated by one or more persons. Workplace
bullying is found by a review of the totality of the circumstances including, but not limited to, the
nature, frequency, and duration of the conduct.
(b) Employers and representative employees shall take all reasonable preventative and
responsive measures to provide safe work environments free from bullying by:
(1) Acknowledging and responding to complaints of bullying within a reasonable time
frame appropriate to the level of urgency;
(2) Providing and executing a transparent, timely complaint process that includes a
legitimate, fair, fact-finding investigation and the issuance of timely and accurate reports of
findings;
(3) Providing and executing a transparent disciplinary process according to the severity of
the offense within a reasonable time frame, if applicable including, but not limited to: coaching,
counseling, a warning, or other disciplinary action, including removal of supervisory duties and/or
termination;
(4) Maintaining accurate records of complaints, findings, and discipline;
(5) Writing, distributing, posting, and otherwise providing a written preventative policy
against all forms of bullying, to include an anti-retaliation policy and an identification and
description of all reporting methods, consistent with this section and all other laws within ninety
(90) days. Such policies shall be distributed to employees on a regular basis.
(6) Training all employees on such preventative and reporting policies. It shall be
considered an affirmative defense for an employer to take prompt, good-faith steps to address
alleged bullying with a threshold of evidence.
LC002724/SUB A - Page 2 of 5

(c) It shall be unlawful for an employer or representative employee to:
(1) Mandate mediation and/or arbitration of a bullying complaint prior to the employee’s
retaining of counsel. Voluntary mediation with both parties’ consent may be permitted only when
employees understand their rights before entering mediation and can consult with legal aid
organizations if they cannot afford an attorney. Employers shall be prohibited from requiring
arbitration as a condition of employment or filing a complaint;
(2) Mandate, offer, or use a non-disclosure or non-disparagement agreement related to a
bullying complaint; and/or
(3) Engage in an adverse employment action. An adverse employment action occurs when
an employee opposes an unlawful employment practice and/or exercises a right under this section
and is then the target of forced resignation, termination, demotion, unfavorable reassignment,
failure to promote, disciplinary action, reduction in compensation, constructive discharge, or a
similar action.
(d) A violation or violations of any part of this section can be enforced by a private right
of action against an individual employee and/or employer in violation of this chapter.
28-61-4. Damages.
(a) Complainants who prove a violation of § 28-61-3 or any of its subparts shall be entitled
to all remedies necessary to make such complainants whole. Remedies shall include, but not be
limited to:
(1) Compensatory damages to include economic (back pay and front pay and/or related
medical expenses) and non-economic (pain, suffering, and/or distress);
(2) Punitive damages when a violation is extreme and/or egregious;
(3) Injunctive relief whereby the court may enjoin the defendant from engaging in the
unlawful employment practice and may order any other relief deemed appropriate (reinstatement
of work and/or removal of the bullying employee from the complainant’s work environment and/or
removal of supervisory duties or termination of said employee);
(4) Restorative measures (correction of reputational damage including false statements
made, the disciplinary record, and/or performance evaluations of the complainant and/or public
notification of the case without disclosing the plaintiff’s name if desired by the plaintiff).
(b) In instances where the employer violates §§ 28-61-3(b)(5) and/or 28-61-3(b)(6), the
penalty shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
(c) In all other instances, the complainant shall receive the greater of all damages as
identified above or five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation of §§ 28-61-3(a), 28-61-3(b) and
or 28-61-3(c) for a maximum of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).
LC002724/SUB A - Page 3 of 5

(d) The at-fault party shall pay the plaintiff’s reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs. A
prevailing employer shall not be awarded fees and costs.
28-61-5. Employee rights.
(a) Any person who has a cause of action under the provisions of this chapter shall have a
period of three (3) years after the last violation of § 28-61-3 to file said cause of action.
(b) A pseudonym can be used in cases where the plaintiff can demonstrate a credible risk
of retaliation or harm at the plaintiff’s request, subject to the court’s approval.
28-61-6. Review.
A regulatory review of this chapter is required five (5) years after the chapter's enactment.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002724/SUB A
========
LC002724/SUB A - Page 4 of 5